Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.110

Cloud on title—Removal.

The instrument in writing provided for in RCW 26.16.100 shall be deemed to be a cloud upon the title of said real estate, and may be removed by the release of the party filing the same, or by any court having jurisdiction in the county where said real estate is situated, whenever it shall appear to said court that the real estate described in said instrument is the separate property of the person in whose name the title to the said real estate, or any part thereof, appears to be vested, from the conveyances on record in the office of the auditor of the county where said real estate is situated.

[ 1891 c 151 s 3; RRS s 10579.]